apertium-eng-kaz.eng.dix
    <pardef n="pa/y__vblex">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>y</l>
        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>y</l>
        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ys</l>
        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>id</l>
        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>id</l>
        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ying</l>
        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ying</l>
        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ying</l>
        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab/ide__vblex">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ide</l>
        <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ide</l>
        <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ides</l>
        <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ode</l>
        <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>ided</l>
        <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ode</l>
        <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>ided</l>
        <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>iding</l>
        <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>iding</l>
        <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>iding</l>
        <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="approach__vblex">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>es</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ed</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ed</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ing</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ing</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ing</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="admit__vblex">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>s</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ted</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ted</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ting</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ting</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ting</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="rot__vblex">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>s</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ted</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ten</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ting</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ting</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ting</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="fit__vblex">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>s</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>ted</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>ted</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ting</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ting</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ting</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

                            <e lm="submit" i=""><i>submit</i><par n="admit__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="transmit" i=""><i>transmit</i><par n="admit__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="undress" i=""><i>undress</i><par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="wish" i=""><i>wish</i><par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="pay cash" i=""><i>pa</i><par n="pa/y__vblex"/><p><l><b/>cash</l><r><g><b/>cash</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="dot the i's and cross the t's" i=""><i>dot</i><par n="admit__vblex"/><p><l><b/>the<b/>i's<b/>and<b/>cross<b/>the<b/>t's</l><r><g><b/>the<b/>i's<b/>and<b/>cross<b/>the<b/>t's</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="smash into" i=""><i>smash</i><par n="approach__vblex"/><p><l><b/>into</l><r><g><b/>into</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="pay at the cash desk" i=""><i>pa</i><par n="pa/y__vblex"/><p><l><b/>at<b/>the<b/>cash<b/>desk</l><r><g><b/>at<b/>the<b/>cash<b/>desk</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="catch a cold" i=""><i>catch</i><par n="approach__vblex"/><p><l><b/>a<b/>cold</l><r><g><b/>a<b/>cold</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="lay drains in" i=""><i>la</i><par n="pa/y__vblex"/><p><l><b/>drains<b/>in</l><r><g><b/>drains<b/>in</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="knot" i=""><i>knot</i><par n="admit__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="abet" i=""><i>abet</i><par n="admit__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="address" i=""><i>address</i><par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="admit" i=""><i>admit</i><par n="admit__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="bless" i=""><i>bless</i><par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="shit" i=""><i>shit</i><par n="admit__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="wet" i=""><i>wet</i><par n="admit__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="trot" i=""><i>trot</i><par n="fit__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="chat" i=""><i>chat</i><par n="admit__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="commit" i=""><i>commit</i><par n="admit__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="cross" i=""><i>cross</i><par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="distinguish" i=""><i>distinguish</i><par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="fish" i=""><i>fish</i><par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="fit" i=""><i>fit</i><par n="fit__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="impoverish" i=""><i>impoverish</i><par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="knit" i=""><i>knit</i><par n="admit__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="lay" i=""><i>la</i><par n="pa/y__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="mix" i=""><i>mix</i><par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="omit" i=""><i>omit</i><par n="admit__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="pay" i=""><i>pa</i><par n="pa/y__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="pay attention" i=""><i>pa</i><par n="pa/y__vblex"/><p><l><b/>attention</l><r><g><b/>attention</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="process" i=""><i>process</i><par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="recess" i=""><i>recess</i><par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="regret" i=""><i>regret</i><par n="admit__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="remit" i=""><i>remit</i><par n="admit__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="say" i=""><i>sa</i><par n="pa/y__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="smash" i=""><i>smash</i><par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="submit" i=""><i>submit</i><par n="admit__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="transmit" i=""><i>transmit</i><par n="admit__vblex"/></e>
			    <e lm="recruit" i=""><i>recruit</i><par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="pay cash" i=""><i>pa</i><par n="pa/y__vblex"/><p><l><b/>cash</l><r><g><b/>cash</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="rot" i=""><i>rot</i><par n="rot__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="pass off as" i=""><i>pass</i><par n="approach__vblex"/><p><l><b/>off<b/>as</l><r><g><b/>off<b/>as</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="unfit" i=""><i>unfit</i><par n="fit__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="flit" i=""><i>flit</i><par n="fit__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="assay" i=""><i>assa</i><par n="pa/y__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="pit" i=""><i>pit</i><par n="admit__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="obsess" i=""><i>obsess</i><par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
